Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-104.01
Agency; petty cash funds; how established; voucher; warrant.

Whenever a need exists, the executive head of any agency of state government may make application to the Director of Administrative Services and the Auditor of Public Accounts to establish and maintain a petty cash fund of not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than three hundred dollars at a specific location in this state. Such application shall specify the purpose for which the fund is to be used. When the Director of Administrative Services and the Auditor of Public Accounts have approved the establishment of any such fund, a voucher shall be submitted to the Department of Administrative Services accompanied by such information as the department may require for the establishment thereof. The Director of Administrative Services shall issue a warrant for the amount specified and deliver it to the establishing agency. The funds to initiate the petty cash fund shall be drawn from the appropriate fund of the agency based on the use of the petty cash fund. When it becomes necessary to replenish any such fund, the voucher therefor shall be accompanied by an accounting of transactions of the fund in such form and detail as the Department of Administrative Services may provide.

Laws 1977, LB 513, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 933, § 10;

Laws 1986, LB 930, § 2.